Hawaii statutes.
§235-20.5 Tax administration special fund;
established. (a) [Subsection effective until December 31,
2015. For subsection effective January 1, 2016, see below.] There
is established a tax administration special fund, into which shall be
deposited:

(1) Fees collected under sections 235-20, 235-110.9,
and 235-110.91;

[(2)] Revenues collected by the special enforcement
section pursuant to section 231-85; provided that in each fiscal year, of the
total revenues collected by the special enforcement section, all revenues in
excess of $500,000 shall be deposited into the general fund.

(a) [Subsection effective January 1,
2016. For subsection effective until December 31, 2015, see above.] There
is established a tax administration special fund, into which shall be
deposited:

(1) Fees collected under sections 235-20, 235-110.9,
and 235-110.91;

(2) Revenues collected by the special enforcement
section pursuant to section 231-85; provided that in each fiscal year, of the
total revenues collected by the special enforcement section, all revenues in
excess of $700,000 shall be deposited into the general fund; and

(3) Fines assessed pursuant to section 237D-4.

(b) The moneys in the fund shall be used for
the following purposes:

(1) Issuing comfort letters, letter rulings, written
opinions, and other guidance to taxpayers;

(2) Issuing certificates under sections 235-110.9 and
235-110.91;

(3) Administering the operations of the special
enforcement section; and

(4) Developing, implementing, and providing taxpayer
education programs, including tax publications. [L 2004, c 215, pt of §3; am L
2007, c 206, §§3, 8; am L 2009, c 134, §§5, 13(1), (3); am L 2013, c 58, §1; am
L 2014, c 89, §1; am L 2015, c 204, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next